Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.720

Graduation pathway options—Review and monitoring—Participation data.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect the following information from school districts: Which graduation pathway options established in *RCW 28A.655.250 are available to students at each school district; and the number of students using each graduation pathway option for graduation purposes. This information shall be reported annually to the education committees of the legislature beginning January 10, 2021. To the extent feasible, data on student participation in each graduation pathway option shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

(2) The state board of education shall review and monitor the implementation of the graduation pathway options to ensure school district compliance with requirements established under RCW 28A.230.710 and subsection (3) of this section. The reviews and monitoring required by this subsection may be conducted concurrently with other oversight and monitoring conducted by the state board of education. The information shall be collected annually and reported to the education committees of the legislature by January 10, 2025, and biennially thereafter.

(3)(a) At least annually, school districts shall examine data on student groups participating in and completing each graduation pathway option offered by the school district. At a minimum, the data on graduation pathway participation and completion must be disaggregated by the student groups described in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3), and by:

(i) Gender;

(ii) Students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW;

(iii) Students who are experiencing homelessness as defined in RCW 28A.300.542; and

(iv) Multilingual/English learners.

(b) If the results of the analysis required under (a) of this subsection show disproportionate participation and completion rates by student groups, the school district shall identify reasons for the observed disproportionality and implement strategies as appropriate to ensure the graduation pathway options are equitably available to all students in the school district.

[ 2024 c 66 s 6; 2023 c 349 s 3; 2021 c 144 s 3; 2019 c 252 s 202. Formerly RCW 28A.655.260.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.250 was recodified as RCW 28A.230.710 pursuant to 2024 c 66 s 14.

Intent—2023 c 349: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.